Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 1 General Provisions

Law reviews.

For note, “Vesting Title in a Murderer:
Where is the Equity in the Georgia Supreme Court’s Interpretation of the Slayer Statute in Levenson?,” see 45 Ga. L. Rev. 877 (2011).

53-2-1.
Rules of inheritance when decedent dies without will; effect of abandonment of child.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Abandon” means that a parent of a minor child, without justifiable cause, fails to communicate with the minor child, care for the minor child, and provide for the minor child’s support as required by law or judicial decree for a period of at least one year immediately prior to the date of the death of the minor.

“Abandonment” means the act of abandoning.

“Minor child” means a person who is less than 18 years of age.

For purposes of this Code section:

Children of the decedent who are born after the decedent’s death are considered children in being at the decedent’s death, provided they were conceived prior to the decedent’s death, were born within ten months of the decedent’s death, and survived 120 hours or more after birth; and

The half-blood, whether on the maternal or paternal side, are considered equally with the whole-blood, so that the children of any common parent are treated as brothers and sisters to each other.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, when a decedent died without a will, the following rules shall determine such decedent’s heirs:

Upon the death of an individual who is survived by a spouse but not by any child or other descendant, the spouse is the sole heir. If the decedent is also survived by any child or other descendant, the spouse shall share equally with the children, with the descendants of any deceased child taking that child’s share, per stirpes; provided, however, that the spouse’s portion shall not be less than a one-third share;

If the decedent is not survived by a spouse, the heirs shall be those relatives, as provided in this Code section, who are in the nearest degree to the decedent in which there is any survivor;

Children of the decedent are in the first degree, and those who survive the decedent shall share the estate equally, with the descendants of any deceased child taking, per stirpes, the share that child would have taken if in life;

Parents of the decedent are in the second degree, and those who survive the decedent shall share the estate equally;

Siblings of the decedent are in the third degree, and those who survive the decedent shall share the estate equally, with the descendants of any deceased sibling taking, per stirpes, the share that sibling would have taken if in life; provided, however, that, subject to the provisions of paragraph (1) of subsection (f) of Code Section 53-1-20, if no sibling survives the decedent, the nieces and nephews who survive the decedent shall take the estate in equal shares, with the descendants of any deceased niece or nephew taking, per stirpes, the share that niece or nephew would have taken if in life;

Grandparents of the decedent are in the fourth degree, and those who survive the decedent shall share the estate equally;

Uncles and aunts of the decedent are in the fifth degree, and those who survive the decedent shall share the estate equally, with the children of any deceased uncle or aunt taking, per stirpes, the share that uncle or aunt would have taken if in life; provided, however, that, subject to the provisions of paragraph (1) of subsection (f) of Code Section 53-1-20, if no uncle or aunt of the decedent survives the decedent, the first cousins who survive the decedent shall share the estate equally; and

The more remote degrees of kinship shall be determined by counting the number of steps in the chain from the relative to the closest common ancestor of the relative and decedent and the number of steps in the chain from the common ancestor to the decedent. The sum of the steps in the two chains shall be the degree of kinship, and the surviving relatives with the lowest sum shall be in the nearest degree and shall share the estate equally.

Except as provided in Code Sections 19-7-1 and 51-4-4 for the right of recovery for the wrongful death of a child, when a minor child dies without a will, a parent who willfully abandoned his or her minor child and has maintained such abandonment shall lose all right to intestate succession to the minor child’s estate and shall not have the right to administer the minor child’s estate. A parent who has been deprived of the custody of his or her minor child under an order of a court of competent jurisdiction and who has substantially complied with the support requirements of the order shall not be barred from inheriting from the minor child’s estate.

For cases in which abandonment is alleged, the moving party shall file a motion with the probate court requesting the judge to determine the issue of abandonment and shall serve all parties as set forth in subsection (f) of this Code section. A hearing shall be conducted and all parties shall have the opportunity to present evidence regarding the party’s relationship with the decedent. The burden of proof to show an abandonment is on the person asserting the abandonment by clear and convincing evidence.

All parties to a motion filed pursuant to subsection (e) of this Code section shall be served in accordance with Chapter 11 of this title. If a party cannot be personally served and the party’s interest in an estate is subject to forfeiture pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section, the judge shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the party. If a party cannot be personally served, the citation shall also be published in the newspaper in which sheriff’s advertisements are published in the county where the party was last known to reside.

In the event that a parent is disqualified from taking a distributive share in the estate of a decedent under subsection (d) of this Code section, the estate of such decedent shall be distributed in accordance with subsection (c) of this Code section as though the parent had predeceased the decedent.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-2-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 8; Ga. L. 2007, p. 210, § 2/HB 139; Ga. L. 2008, p. 324, § 53/SB 455.

Law reviews.

For article surveying wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 323 (1982).

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2004).

For note, “Status or Contract? A Comparative Analysis of Inheritance Rights under Equitable Adoption and Domestic Partnership Doctrines,” see 39 Ga. L. Rev. 675 (2005).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 403 (2005).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 423 (2006).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 447 (2007).

For note, “Not Just For Kids:
Why Georgia’s Statutory Disinheritance of Deadbeat Parents Should Extend to Intestate Adults,” see 43 Ga. L. Rev. 867 (2009).

For note, “Vesting Title in a Murderer:
Where is the Equity in the Georgia Supreme Court’s Interpretation of the Slayer Statute in Levenson?,” see 45 Ga. L. Rev. 877 (2011).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 325 (2012).

For article, “Marriage, Death and Taxes:
The Estate Planning Impact of Windsor and Obergefell on Georgia’s Same Sex Spouses,” see 21 Ga. St. Bar. J. 9 (Oct. 2015).

53-2-2.
[Reserved] Effect of decree of adoption.

History.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10, was to become effective January 1, 1998, but was repealed and reserved by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 3; repealed by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 3, effective January 1, 1998.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 3 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective January 1, 1998.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 repeal of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).

53-2-3.
Inheritance by children born out of wedlock.

The rights of inheritance of a child born out of wedlock shall be as follows:

A child born out of wedlock may inherit in the same manner as though legitimate from or through the child’s mother, the other children of the mother, and any other maternal kin;

A child born out of wedlock may not inherit from or through the child’s father, the other children of the father, or any paternal kin by reason of the paternal kinship, unless:

A court of competent jurisdiction has entered an order declaring the child to be legitimate, under the authority of Code Section 19-7-22 or such other authority as may be provided by law;

A court of competent jurisdiction has otherwise entered a court order establishing paternity;

The father has executed a sworn statement signed by him attesting to the parent-child relationship;

The father has signed the birth certificate of the child; or

There is other clear and convincing evidence that the child is the child of the father.

Subparagraph (A) of this paragraph notwithstanding, a child born out of wedlock may inherit from or through the father, other children of the father, or any paternal kin by reason of the paternal kinship if evidence of the rebuttable presumption of paternity described in this subparagraph is filed with the court before which proceedings on the estate are pending and the presumption is not overcome to the satisfaction of the trier of fact by clear and convincing evidence.

There shall exist a rebuttable presumption of paternity of a child born out of wedlock if parentage-determination genetic testing establishes at least a 97 percent probability of paternity. Parentage-determination genetic testing shall include, but not be limited to, red cell antigen, human leucocyte antigen (HLA), red cell enzyme, and serum protein electrophoresis tests or testing by deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) probes.

If any one of the requirements of divisions (i) through (v) of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph is fulfilled, or if the presumption of paternity set forth in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph shall have been established and shall not have been rebutted by clear and convincing evidence, a child born out of wedlock may inherit in the same manner as though legitimate from and through the child’s father, the other children of his or her father, and any other paternal kin;

In distributions under this Code section, the children of a deceased child born out of wedlock shall represent that deceased child.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-2-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 4.

Law reviews.

For note on the role of a judicial determination of paternity in the inheritance rights of illegitimate children in Georgia, see 16 Ga. L. Rev. 170 (1981).

For article surveying wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 323 (1982).

For article surveying 1982 Eleventh Circuit cases involving constitutional civil law, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 1221 (1983).

For article, “Georgia Inheritance Rights of Children Born Out of Wedlock,” see 23 Ga. St. B.J. 28 (1986).

For annual survey of law of domestic relations, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 179 (1986).

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (1986).

For note on 1991 amendment of former O.C.G.A. §

53-4-4

, see 8 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 197 (1992).

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).

For comment on equitable adoption, equitable legitimation, and inheritance in extralegal family arrangements, see 48 Emory L.J. 943
(1999).

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2004).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 403 (2005).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (2008).

For annual survey of law on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 365 (2010).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 273 (2015).

53-2-4.
Inheritance from children born out of wedlock.

The mother of a child born out of wedlock, the other children of the mother, and other maternal kin may inherit from and through the child born out of wedlock in the same manner as though the child were legitimate.

The father of a child born out of wedlock, the other children of the father, and other paternal kin may inherit from and through the child born out of wedlock in the same manner as if the child were legitimate if:

A court of competent jurisdiction has entered an order declaring the child to be legitimate under the authority of Code Section 19-7-22 or such other authority as may be provided by law;

A court of competent jurisdiction has otherwise entered a court order establishing paternity;

The father has, during the lifetime of the child, executed a sworn statement signed by the father attesting to the parent-child relationship; provided, however, that when the court determines by clear and convincing evidence that the father caused his child to be conceived as a result of having nonconsensual sexual intercourse with the mother of his child or when the mother is less than ten years of age, such sworn statement shall be insufficient for purposes of this subsection;

The father has, during the lifetime of the child, signed the birth certificate of the child; or

The presumption of paternity described in division (2)(B)(ii) of Code Section 53-2-3 has been established and has not been rebutted by clear and convincing evidence.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-2-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1316, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 219, § 5/SB 331.

Law reviews.

For comment on equitable adoption, equitable legitimation, and inheritance in extralegal family arrangements, see 48 Emory L.J. 943
(1999).

For note, “Deadbeat Dads: Undeserving of the Right to Inherit from Their Illegitimate Children and Undeserving of Equal Protection,” see 34 Ga. L. Rev. 1773 (2000).

For note, “Rainey v. Chever: Expanding a Natural Father’s Right to Inherit from His Illegitimate Child,” see 51 Mercer L. Rev. 761 (2000).

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2004).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 403 (2005).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (2008).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U. L. Rev. 127 (2016).

53-2-5.
Children conceived by artificial insemination.

An individual conceived by artificial insemination and presumed legitimate in accordance with Code Section 19-7-21 shall be considered a child of the parents and entitled to inherit under the laws of intestacy from the parents and from relatives of the parents, and the parents and relatives of the parents shall likewise be entitled to inherit as heirs from and through such individual.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-2-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For note, “A New Era of Dead-Beat Dads: Determining Social Security Survivor Benefits for Children Who Are Posthumously Conceived,” see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 759 (2005).

53-2-6.
Individual related to decedent through two or more lines of relationship.

An individual who is related to the decedent through two or more lines of relationship is entitled to only a single share based on the relationship entitling that individual to the largest share under the laws of intestacy.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-2-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-2-7.
Vesting of title to property; right to possession.

Upon the death of an intestate decedent who is the owner of any interest in real property, the title to any such interest which survives the intestate decedent shall vest immediately in the decedent’s heirs at law, subject to divestment by the appointment of an administrator of the estate.

The title to all other property owned by an intestate decedent shall vest in the administrator of the estate for the benefit of the decedent’s heirs and creditors.

Upon the appointment of an administrator, the title to any interest in real property which survives the intestate decedent shall vest in the administrator for the benefit of the heirs and creditors of the decedent, and title to such property shall not revest in the heirs until the administrator assents to such revesting. For purposes of this Code section, the assent of the administrator shall be proved in the manner set out in Code Section 53-8-15.

Upon the appointment of an administrator, the right to the possession of the whole estate is in the administrator, and, as long as administration continues, the right to recover possession of the estate from all other persons is solely in the administrator. The administrator may recover possession of any part of the estate from the heirs at law or purchasers from them; but, in order to recover real property, it is necessary for the administrator to show, upon the trial, either that the property which is the subject of the action has been in the administrator’s possession and without the administrator’s consent is held by the defendant at the time of bringing the action or that it is necessary for the administrator to have possession for the purpose of paying the debts, making a proper distribution, or for other purposes provided for by law. An order for sale or distribution, granted by the judge of the probate court after notice to the defendant, shall be conclusive evidence of either fact.

If an order has been entered under Code Section 53-2-41 that no administration is necessary, or if the administrator has assented to the vesting of title in the heirs, the heirs may take possession of the property or may sue for possession of the property in their own right.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-2-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 9; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1335, § 1.

Cross references.

Admissible evidence for determining parent and child relationship, §

19-7-46

.

DNA analysis upon conviction of certain sex offenses, §

35-3-160

et seq.

Genetic testing, T. 33, C. 54.

Law reviews.

For article advocating uniform treatment of the devolution of title, and abolition of distinctions based on the form of wealth or the fact of intestacy, see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 447 (1976).

For note on 2000 amendment of this Code section, see 17 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 320 (2000).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 325 (2012).

53-2-8.
Death intestate, and without ascertainable heirs, of spouse of intestate decedent.

When the spouse of an intestate decedent dies intestate and without ascertainable heirs within six months of the decedent’s death, any undistributed property of the decedent to which the spouse had been entitled prior to the spouse’s death shall not escheat but shall be distributed to the heirs of the decedent who would have inherited the property under the intestacy laws if the spouse had predeceased the decedent.

The nonexistence of heirs of the spouse may be determined by publication as provided in Code Section 53-2-51. If no heir of the spouse appears, the property, less the expenses of the proceedings to determine the nonexistence of heirs, shall be paid over as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-2-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, “Code Section” was substituted for “Code section” in the first sentence in subsection (b).